test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON V65	
+V65:sstö	Modes ;
+V65:suäs	Modes ;
+V65:sbfe	Modes ;
+V65:sxäq	Modes ;
+V65:siek	Modes ;
+V65:skjf	Modes ;
+V65:sxnh	Modes ;
+V65:sjpt	Modes ;
+V65:sorf	Modes ;
+V65:sxvj	Modes ;
+V65:såop	Modes ;
+V65:sdqz	Modes ;
+V65:sdfr	Modes ;
+V65:sgrx	Modes ;
+V65:szgl	Modes ;
+V65:säyk	Modes ;
+V65:souå	Modes ;
+V65:ssyn	Modes ;
+V65:söäc	Modes ;
+V65:szmz	Modes ;
+V65:shåq	Modes ;
+V65:scnt	Modes ;
+V65:seon	Modes ;
+V65:sdcg	Modes ;
+V65:sina	Modes ;
+V65:sbmx	Modes ;
+V65:sryj	Modes ;
+V65:spiå	Modes ;
+V65:sdgq	Modes ;
+V65:säpv	Modes ;
+V65:suwq	Modes ;
+V65:swzr	Modes ;
+V65:swsn	Modes ;
+V65:söxå	Modes ;
+V65:slgx	Modes ;
+V65:ssyj	Modes ;
+V65:söpn	Modes ;
+V65:shsc	Modes ;
+V65:swki	Modes ;
+V65:skmt	Modes ;
+V65:spåc	Modes ;
+V65:syod	Modes ;
+V65:sqvu	Modes ;
+V65:swpk	Modes ;
+V65:snöö	Modes ;
+V65:sovq	Modes ;
+V65:stli	Modes ;
+V65:ståz	Modes ;
+V65:skjj	Modes ;
+V65:saöc	Modes ;
+V65:sshj	Modes ;
+V65:suli	Modes ;
+V65:såwm	Modes ;
+V65:sgöu	Modes ;
+V65:swde	Modes ;
+V65:suzv	Modes ;
+V65:spoz	Modes ;
+V65:ssvg	Modes ;
+V65:scdx	Modes ;
+V65:szyg	Modes ;
+V65:sbem	Modes ;
+V65:sfzj	Modes ;
+V65:säzj	Modes ;
+V65:snän	Modes ;
+V65:seöb	Modes ;
+V65:säuz	Modes ;
+V65:sxjö	Modes ;
+V65:sngr	Modes ;
+V65:svxn	Modes ;
+V65:sltu	Modes ;
+V65:sääx	Modes ;
+V65:srfx	Modes ;
+V65:spcd	Modes ;
+V65:sjri	Modes ;
+V65:sppn	Modes ;
+V65:sshg	Modes ;
+V65:szsö	Modes ;
+V65:siga	Modes ;
+V65:seqq	Modes ;
+V65:szkå	Modes ;
+V65:svxi	Modes ;
+V65:sbjk	Modes ;
+V65:sööm	Modes ;
+V65:sdaä	Modes ;
+V65:sude	Modes ;
+V65:ssrq	Modes ;
+V65:ståa	Modes ;
+V65:syxl	Modes ;
+V65:sfco	Modes ;
+V65:scnl	Modes ;
+V65:smic	Modes ;
+V65:sidc	Modes ;
+V65:scpq	Modes ;
+V65:suha	Modes ;
+V65:sith	Modes ;
+V65:sgri	Modes ;
+V65:srej	Modes ;
+V65:suwm	Modes ;
+V65:sdvn	Modes ;


LEXICON V66	
+V66:tzcg	Modes ;
+V66:tqoi	Modes ;
+V66:twjä	Modes ;
+V66:tåth	Modes ;
+V66:tohp	Modes ;
+V66:tbln	Modes ;
+V66:tävk	Modes ;
+V66:ttcy	Modes ;
+V66:tkdg	Modes ;
+V66:tbwk	Modes ;
+V66:tydi	Modes ;
+V66:tuap	Modes ;
+V66:tauq	Modes ;
+V66:tnmo	Modes ;
+V66:tzxu	Modes ;
+V66:tims	Modes ;
+V66:tdkl	Modes ;
+V66:tgqr	Modes ;
+V66:tftr	Modes ;
+V66:tloq	Modes ;
+V66:töet	Modes ;
+V66:tryi	Modes ;
+V66:tlrp	Modes ;
+V66:tstr	Modes ;
+V66:tucz	Modes ;
+V66:tikd	Modes ;
+V66:töyj	Modes ;
+V66:tfät	Modes ;
+V66:thwc	Modes ;
+V66:tcxv	Modes ;
+V66:tköz	Modes ;
+V66:tmax	Modes ;
+V66:tcej	Modes ;
+V66:tqiq	Modes ;
+V66:tdpw	Modes ;
+V66:tkgå	Modes ;
+V66:tska	Modes ;
+V66:tdåk	Modes ;
+V66:txgf	Modes ;
+V66:tguc	Modes ;
+V66:tbye	Modes ;
+V66:tfåg	Modes ;
+V66:tvlx	Modes ;
+V66:tanh	Modes ;
+V66:tccy	Modes ;
+V66:tbyk	Modes ;
+V66:tfdf	Modes ;
+V66:tbrx	Modes ;
+V66:tjog	Modes ;
+V66:tape	Modes ;
+V66:tåqw	Modes ;
+V66:tagl	Modes ;
+V66:tonx	Modes ;
+V66:tcsä	Modes ;
+V66:tvbw	Modes ;
+V66:tkaö	Modes ;
+V66:tdgn	Modes ;
+V66:tzqf	Modes ;
+V66:tngb	Modes ;
+V66:taxz	Modes ;
+V66:tckd	Modes ;
+V66:töjr	Modes ;
+V66:tskt	Modes ;
+V66:tcsä	Modes ;
+V66:taåg	Modes ;
+V66:tqje	Modes ;
+V66:taya	Modes ;
+V66:taoh	Modes ;
+V66:tånx	Modes ;
+V66:tcbw	Modes ;
+V66:täzy	Modes ;
+V66:tkåä	Modes ;
+V66:tjtn	Modes ;
+V66:tavö	Modes ;
+V66:tqdt	Modes ;
+V66:tnis	Modes ;
+V66:täwå	Modes ;
+V66:trln	Modes ;
+V66:tjoa	Modes ;
+V66:trvc	Modes ;
+V66:tory	Modes ;
+V66:tååö	Modes ;
+V66:twnr	Modes ;
+V66:tfzk	Modes ;
+V66:tezu	Modes ;
+V66:tsyw	Modes ;
+V66:tgyq	Modes ;
+V66:tqbk	Modes ;
+V66:tgwm	Modes ;
+V66:tfyb	Modes ;
+V66:tmcr	Modes ;
+V66:tple	Modes ;
+V66:tnse	Modes ;
+V66:tdug	Modes ;
+V66:täut	Modes ;
+V66:tkno	Modes ;
+V66:twxc	Modes ;
+V66:txfp	Modes ;
+V66:taoö	Modes ;


LEXICON V67	
+V67:uqzr	Modes ;
+V67:uvjå	Modes ;
+V67:usäp	Modes ;
+V67:uioi	Modes ;
+V67:ugyb	Modes ;
+V67:uqsö	Modes ;
+V67:ubyy	Modes ;
+V67:umfo	Modes ;
+V67:uybm	Modes ;
+V67:umco	Modes ;
+V67:udbj	Modes ;
+V67:udlz	Modes ;
+V67:uojo	Modes ;
+V67:ueek	Modes ;
+V67:uqxb	Modes ;
+V67:uvsg	Modes ;
+V67:udhc	Modes ;
+V67:uqöd	Modes ;
+V67:ukwp	Modes ;
+V67:urlp	Modes ;
+V67:uqba	Modes ;
+V67:uhpt	Modes ;
+V67:ubxo	Modes ;
+V67:uoäs	Modes ;
+V67:uhvl	Modes ;
+V67:udåg	Modes ;
+V67:ulwc	Modes ;
+V67:ujyq	Modes ;
+V67:ueåf	Modes ;
+V67:uifq	Modes ;
+V67:uzyo	Modes ;
+V67:uopy	Modes ;
+V67:uygj	Modes ;
+V67:upwå	Modes ;
+V67:ugdu	Modes ;
+V67:umdp	Modes ;
+V67:ubls	Modes ;
+V67:uuxb	Modes ;
+V67:uocu	Modes ;
+V67:uluå	Modes ;
+V67:uzhr	Modes ;
+V67:uuce	Modes ;
+V67:ukhc	Modes ;
+V67:ubxw	Modes ;
+V67:uöpå	Modes ;
+V67:uwbz	Modes ;
+V67:ubmm	Modes ;
+V67:ueie	Modes ;
+V67:upcu	Modes ;
+V67:ubtu	Modes ;
+V67:ubln	Modes ;
+V67:uhcb	Modes ;
+V67:uwyv	Modes ;
+V67:uhxw	Modes ;
+V67:uqpö	Modes ;
+V67:uicf	Modes ;
+V67:uwqr	Modes ;
+V67:uanh	Modes ;
+V67:ugrg	Modes ;
+V67:uäme	Modes ;
+V67:uzqj	Modes ;
+V67:umjw	Modes ;
+V67:ujzd	Modes ;
+V67:uyxq	Modes ;
+V67:urjh	Modes ;
+V67:uväa	Modes ;
+V67:uhmb	Modes ;
+V67:uyzr	Modes ;
+V67:uqåj	Modes ;
+V67:uemp	Modes ;
+V67:uqgp	Modes ;
+V67:ufbc	Modes ;
+V67:ucjj	Modes ;
+V67:ushå	Modes ;
+V67:utaö	Modes ;
+V67:uifq	Modes ;
+V67:uäka	Modes ;
+V67:ubpp	Modes ;
+V67:unbz	Modes ;
+V67:uffm	Modes ;
+V67:ujkj	Modes ;
+V67:uyun	Modes ;
+V67:uili	Modes ;
+V67:urvb	Modes ;
+V67:utja	Modes ;
+V67:umöl	Modes ;
+V67:uäxk	Modes ;
+V67:uvhn	Modes ;
+V67:uete	Modes ;
+V67:uåkw	Modes ;
+V67:uåcc	Modes ;
+V67:uzhs	Modes ;
+V67:ujrä	Modes ;
+V67:uocu	Modes ;
+V67:ucni	Modes ;
+V67:usxh	Modes ;
+V67:uzwi	Modes ;
+V67:uötg	Modes ;
+V67:unxå	Modes ;


LEXICON V68	
+V68:vwsc	Modes ;
+V68:vefy	Modes ;
+V68:vcig	Modes ;
+V68:vjvq	Modes ;
+V68:vugk	Modes ;
+V68:vvåd	Modes ;
+V68:vbbw	Modes ;
+V68:vöqf	Modes ;
+V68:vaen	Modes ;
+V68:vedx	Modes ;
+V68:vpåj	Modes ;
+V68:vuqf	Modes ;
+V68:vpyk	Modes ;
+V68:vkäå	Modes ;
+V68:viäg	Modes ;
+V68:vdaw	Modes ;
+V68:vbzy	Modes ;
+V68:vpln	Modes ;
+V68:vjtj	Modes ;
+V68:våäs	Modes ;
+V68:vtiz	Modes ;
+V68:vhen	Modes ;
+V68:vaoå	Modes ;
+V68:vkeb	Modes ;
+V68:vcqk	Modes ;
+V68:vwik	Modes ;
+V68:vöxe	Modes ;
+V68:vqpo	Modes ;
+V68:vögf	Modes ;
+V68:vrsr	Modes ;
+V68:vmwu	Modes ;
+V68:vybo	Modes ;
+V68:vhhf	Modes ;
+V68:vsqa	Modes ;
+V68:vycm	Modes ;
+V68:vaqp	Modes ;
+V68:vrmå	Modes ;
+V68:vlyi	Modes ;
+V68:vfcq	Modes ;
+V68:vyer	Modes ;
+V68:vyäe	Modes ;
+V68:vzrv	Modes ;
+V68:vixz	Modes ;
+V68:vbkm	Modes ;
+V68:vksq	Modes ;
+V68:vvöf	Modes ;
+V68:vgmå	Modes ;
+V68:vlck	Modes ;
+V68:vöms	Modes ;
+V68:vgks	Modes ;
+V68:vfmå	Modes ;
+V68:vjyr	Modes ;
+V68:voad	Modes ;
+V68:vvsm	Modes ;
+V68:vals	Modes ;
+V68:vuvä	Modes ;
+V68:vphf	Modes ;
+V68:vzui	Modes ;
+V68:vznk	Modes ;
+V68:vlps	Modes ;
+V68:vbrå	Modes ;
+V68:vzlx	Modes ;
+V68:vsju	Modes ;
+V68:vkgs	Modes ;
+V68:vsgd	Modes ;
+V68:vcjq	Modes ;
+V68:vjtf	Modes ;
+V68:vqwu	Modes ;
+V68:vnöf	Modes ;
+V68:vödr	Modes ;
+V68:väjn	Modes ;
+V68:vkso	Modes ;
+V68:vnnz	Modes ;
+V68:våle	Modes ;
+V68:vapä	Modes ;
+V68:vmhö	Modes ;
+V68:vmmo	Modes ;
+V68:vflb	Modes ;
+V68:vuaä	Modes ;
+V68:vtiy	Modes ;
+V68:vjäy	Modes ;
+V68:vöss	Modes ;
+V68:vtym	Modes ;
+V68:varm	Modes ;
+V68:vpix	Modes ;
+V68:vspj	Modes ;
+V68:vnld	Modes ;
+V68:vvxå	Modes ;
+V68:vsji	Modes ;
+V68:vhöd	Modes ;
+V68:vnrw	Modes ;
+V68:våöo	Modes ;
+V68:vcgj	Modes ;
+V68:vrcr	Modes ;
+V68:våjq	Modes ;
+V68:vaxq	Modes ;
+V68:vojo	Modes ;
+V68:vkgi	Modes ;
+V68:vdkz	Modes ;

LEXICON Root
h V65 ;
i V66 ;
j V67 ;
k V68 ;
